Utah statutes.
31A-23a-201.   Exceptions to producer licensing.

(1)  The commissioner may not require a license as an insurance producer of:

(a)  an officer, director, or employee of an insurer or of an insurance producer if:

(i)  the officer, director, or employee does not receive any commission on a policy written or sold to insure risks residing, located, or to be performed in this state; and

(ii) (A)  the officer's, director's, or employee's activities are:

(I)  executive, administrative, managerial, clerical, or a combination of these activities; and

(II)  only indirectly related to the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance;

(B)  the officer's, director's, or employee's function relates to:

(I)  underwriting;

(II)  loss control;

(III)  inspection; or

(IV)  the processing, adjusting, investigating or settling of a claim on a contract of insurance; or

(C) (I)  the officer, director, or employee is acting in the capacity of a special agent or agency supervisor assisting an insurance producer;

(II)  the officer's, director's, or employee's activities are limited to providing technical advice and assistance to a licensed insurance producer; and

(III)  the officer's, director's, or employee's activities do not include the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance;

(b)  a person who:

(i)  is paid no commission for the services described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii); and

(ii)  secures and furnishes information for the purpose of:

(A)  group life insurance;

(B)  group property and casualty insurance;

(C)  group annuities;

(D)  group or blanket accident and health insurance;

(E)  enrolling individuals under plans;

(F)  issuing certificates under plans; or

(G)  otherwise assisting in administering plans;

(c)  a person who:

(i)  is paid no commission for the services described in Subsection (1)(c)(ii); and

(ii)  performs administrative services related to mass marketed property and casualty insurance;

(d) (i)  any of the following if the conditions of Subsection (1)(d)(ii) are met:

(A)  an employer or association; or

(B)  an officer, director, employee, or trustee of an employee trust plan;

(ii)  a person listed in Subsection (1)(d)(i):

(A)  to the extent that the employer, officer, employee, director, or trustee is engaged in the administration or operation of a program of employee benefits for:

(I)  the employer's or association's own employees; or

(II)  the employees of a subsidiary or affiliate of an employer or association;

(B)  the program involves the use of insurance issued by an insurer; and

(C)  the employer, association, officer, director, employee, or trustee is not in any manner compensated, directly or indirectly, by the company issuing the contract;

(e)  an employee of an insurer or organization employed by an insurer who:

(i)  is engaging in:

(A)  the inspection, rating, or classification of risks; or

(B)  the supervision of the training of insurance producers; and

(ii)  is not individually engaged in the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance;

(f)  a person whose activities in this state are limited to advertising:

(i)  without the intent to solicit insurance in this state;

(ii)  through communications in mass media including:

(A)  a printed publication; or

(B)  a form of electronic mass media;

(iii)  that is distributed to residents outside of the state; and

(iv)  if the person does not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance that would insure risks residing, located, or to be performed in this state;

(g)  a person who:

(i)  is not a resident of this state;

(ii)  sells, solicits, or negotiates a contract of insurance:

(A)  for commercial property and casualty risks to an insured with risks located in more than one state insured under that contract; and

(B)  insures risks located in a state in which the person is licensed as provided in Subsection (1)(g)(iii); and

(iii)  is licensed as an insurance producer to sell, solicit, or negotiate that insurance in the state where the insured maintains its principal place of business; or

(h)  if the employee does not sell, solicit, or receive a commission for a contract of insurance, a salaried full-time employee who counsels or advises the employee's employer relating to the insurance interests of:

(i)  the employer; or

(ii)  a subsidiary or business affiliate of the employer.

(2)  The commissioner may by rule exempt a class of persons from the license requirement of Subsection 31A-23a-103(1) if:

(a)  the functions performed by the class of persons does not require:

(i)  special competence;

(ii)  special trustworthiness; or

(iii)  regulatory surveillance made possible by licensing; or

(b)  other existing safeguards make regulation unnecessary.

